src/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
LEXICON V22_even
! -йы
+V+Inf:%>яӈкве K ;

+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg1:%>е̄гум K ;
+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg2:%>е̄гын K ;
+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg3:%>и K ;
+V+Ind+Prs+ScDu1:%>име̄н K ;
+V+Ind+Prs+ScDu2:%>егы̄н K ;
+V+Ind+Prs+ScDu3:%>е̄г K ;
+V+Ind+Prs+ScPl1:%>е̄в K ;
+V+Ind+Prs+ScPl2:%>егы̄н K ;
+V+Ind+Prs+ScPl3:%>е̄гыт K ;

+V+Ind+Prs+OcSg3+ScSg1:%>илум K ;
+V+Ind+Prs+OcSg3+ScSg2:%>илын K ;
+V+Ind+Prs+OcSg3+ScSg3:%>итэ K ;
+V+Ind+Prs+OcSg3+ScDu1:%>иламе̄н K ;
+V+Ind+Prs+OcSg3+ScDu2:%>илы̄н K ;
+V+Ind+Prs+OcSg3+ScDu3:%>итэ̄н K ;
+V+Ind+Prs+OcSg3+ScPl1:%>илув K ;
+V+Ind+Prs+OcSg3+ScPl2:%>илы̄н K ;
+V+Ind+Prs+OcSg3+ScPl3:%>ия̄ныл K ;

+V+Ind+Prs+OcDu3+ScSg1:%>иягум K ;
+V+Ind+Prs+OcDu3+ScSg2:%>иягын K ;
+V+Ind+Prs+OcDu3+ScSg3:%>ияге K ;
+V+Ind+Prs+OcDu3+ScDu1:%>иягме̄н K ;
+V+Ind+Prs+OcDu3+ScDu2:%>иягы̄н K ;
+V+Ind+Prs+OcDu3+ScDu3:%>ияге̄н K ;
+V+Ind+Prs+OcDu3+ScPl1:%>иягув K ;
+V+Ind+Prs+OcDu3+ScPl2:%>иягы̄н K ;
+V+Ind+Prs+OcDu3+ScPl3:%>ияга̄ныл K ;

+V+Ind+Prs+OcPl3+ScSg1:%>иянум K ;
+V+Ind+Prs+OcPl3+ScSg2:%>иян K ;
+V+Ind+Prs+OcPl3+ScSg3:%>иянэ K ;
+V+Ind+Prs+OcPl3+ScDu1:%>иянме̄н K ;
+V+Ind+Prs+OcPl3+ScDu2:%>ияны̄н K ;
+V+Ind+Prs+OcPl3+ScDu3:%>иянэ̄н K ;
+V+Ind+Prs+OcPl3+ScPl1:%>иянув K ;
+V+Ind+Prs+OcPl3+ScPl2:%>ияны̄н K ;
+V+Ind+Prs+OcPl3+ScPl3:%>ия̄ныл K ;
+V+Ind+Prs+OcPl3+ScPl3:%>ияна̄ныл K ;

+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg1:%>исум K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg2:%>исын K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg3:%>ис K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+ScDu1:%>исаме̄н K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+ScDu2:%>исы̄н K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+ScDu3:%>исы̄г K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+ScPl1:%>исӯв K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+ScPl2:%>исы̄н K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+ScPl3:%>исыт K ;

+V+Ind+Prt+OcSg3+ScSg1:%>ислум K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+OcSg3+ScSg2:%>ислын K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+OcSg3+ScSg3:%>истэ K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+OcSg3+ScDu1:%>исламе̄н K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+OcSg3+ScDu2:%>ислы̄н K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+OcSg3+ScDu3:%>истэ̄н K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+OcSg3+ScPl1:%>ислув K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+OcSg3+ScPl2:%>ислы̄н K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+OcSg3+ScPl3:%>иса̄ныл K ;

+V+Ind+Prt+OcDu3+ScSg1:%>исагум K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+OcDu3+ScSg2:%>исагын K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+OcDu3+ScSg3:%>исаге K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+OcDu3+ScDu1:%>исагме̄н K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+OcDu3+ScDu2:%>исагы̄н K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+OcDu3+ScDu3:%>исаге̄н K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+OcDu3+ScPl1:%>исагув K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+OcDu3+ScPl2:%>исагы̄н K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+OcDu3+ScPl3:%>иса̄ныл K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+OcDu3+ScPl3:%>исаганыл K ;

+V+Ind+Prt+OcPl3+ScSg1:%>исанум K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+OcPl3+ScSg2:%>исан K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+OcPl3+ScSg3:%>исанэ K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+OcPl3+ScDu1:%>исанме̄н K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+OcPl3+ScDu2:%>исаны̄н K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+OcPl3+ScDu3:%>исанэ̄н K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+OcPl3+ScPl1:%>исанув K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+OcPl3+ScPl2:%>исаны̄н K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+OcPl3+ScPl3:%>исаныл K ;

+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg1:%>ясум K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg2:%>ясын K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg3:%>яс K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+ScDu1:%>ясаме̄н K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+ScDu2:%>ясы̄н K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+ScDu3:%>ясы̄г K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+ScPl1:%>ясӯв K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+ScPl2:%>ясы̄н K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+ScPl3:%>ясыт K ;

+V+Ind+Prt+OcSg3+ScSg1:%>яслум K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+OcSg3+ScSg2:%>яслын K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+OcSg3+ScSg3:%>ястэ K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+OcSg3+ScDu1:%>ясламе̄н K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+OcSg3+ScDu2:%>яслы̄н K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+OcSg3+ScDu3:%>ястэ̄н K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+OcSg3+ScPl1:%>яслув K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+OcSg3+ScPl2:%>яслы̄н K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+OcSg3+ScPl3:%>яса̄ныл K ;

+V+Ind+Prt+OcDu3+ScSg1:%>ясагум K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+OcDu3+ScSg2:%>ясагын K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+OcDu3+ScSg3:%>ясаге K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+OcDu3+ScDu1:%>ясагме̄н K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+OcDu3+ScDu2:%>ясагы̄н K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+OcDu3+ScDu3:%>ясаге̄н K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+OcDu3+ScPl1:%>ясагув K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+OcDu3+ScPl2:%>ясагы̄н K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+OcDu3+ScPl3:%>яса̄ныл K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+OcDu3+ScPl3:%>ясаганыл K ;

+V+Ind+Prt+OcPl3+ScSg1:%>ясанум K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+OcPl3+ScSg2:%>ясан K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+OcPl3+ScSg3:%>ясанэ K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+OcPl3+ScDu1:%>ясанме̄н K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+OcPl3+ScDu2:%>ясаны̄н K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+OcPl3+ScDu3:%>ясанэ̄н K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+OcPl3+ScPl1:%>ясанув K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+OcPl3+ScPl2:%>ясаны̄н K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+OcPl3+ScPl3:%>ясаныл K ;

+V+Cond+Prs+ScSg1:%>йнӯвум K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+ScSg2:%>йнӯвын K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+ScSg3:%>йнув K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+ScDu1:%>йнуваме̄н K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+ScDu2:%>йнувы̄н K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+ScDu3:%>йнувы̄г K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+ScPl1:%>йнувӯв K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+ScPl2:%>йнувы̄н K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+ScPl3:%>йнӯвыт K ;

+V+Cond+Prs+OcSg3+ScSg1:%>йнӯвлум K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcSg3+ScSg2:%>йнӯвлын K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcSg3+ScSg3:%>йнӯвтэ K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcSg3+ScDu1:%>йнувламе̄н K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcSg3+ScDu2:%>йнувлы̄н K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcSg3+ScDu3:%>йнувтэ̄н K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcSg3+ScPl1:%>йнувлув K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcSg3+ScPl2:%>йнувлын K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcSg3+ScPl3:%>йнува̄ныл K ;

+V+Cond+Prs+OcDu3+ScSg1:%>йнува̄гум K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcDu3+ScSg2:%>йнува̄гын K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcDu3+ScSg3:%>йнува̄ге K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcDu3+ScDu1:%>йнувагме̄н K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcDu3+ScDu2:%>йнувагы̄н K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcDu3+ScDu3:%>йнуваге̄н K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcDu3+ScPl1:%>йнувагув K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcDu3+ScPl2:%>йнувагы̄н K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcDu3+ScPl3:%>йнувага̄ныл K ;

+V+Cond+Prs+OcPl3+ScSg1:%>йнува̄нум K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcPl3+ScSg2:%>йнува̄нын K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcPl3+ScSg3:%>йнува̄нэ K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcPl3+ScDu1:%>йнуванме̄н K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcPl3+ScDu2:%>йнуваны̄н K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcPl3+ScDu3:%>йнуванэ̄н K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcPl3+ScPl1:%>йнуванув K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcPl3+ScPl2:%>йнуваны̄н K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcPl3+ScPl3:%>йнува̄ныл K ;

+V+Cond+Prs+ScSg1:%>инӯвум K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+ScSg2:%>инӯвын K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+ScSg3:%>инув K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+ScDu1:%>инуваме̄н K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+ScDu2:%>инувы̄н K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+ScDu3:%>инувы̄г K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+ScPl1:%>инувӯв K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+ScPl2:%>инувы̄н K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+ScPl3:%>инӯвыт K ;

+V+Cond+Prs+OcSg3+ScSg1:%>инӯвлум K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcSg3+ScSg2:%>инӯвлын K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcSg3+ScSg3:%>инӯвтэ K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcSg3+ScDu1:%>инувламе̄н K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcSg3+ScDu2:%>инувлы̄н K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcSg3+ScDu3:%>инувтэ̄н K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcSg3+ScPl1:%>инувлув K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcSg3+ScPl2:%>инувлын K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcSg3+ScPl3:%>инува̄ныл K ;

+V+Cond+Prs+OcDu3+ScSg1:%>инува̄гум K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcDu3+ScSg2:%>инува̄гын K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcDu3+ScSg3:%>инува̄ге K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcDu3+ScDu1:%>инувагме̄н K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcDu3+ScDu2:%>инувагы̄н K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcDu3+ScDu3:%>инуваге̄н K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcDu3+ScPl1:%>инувагув K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcDu3+ScPl2:%>инувагы̄н K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcDu3+ScPl3:%>инувага̄ныл K ;

+V+Cond+Prs+OcPl3+ScSg1:%>инува̄нум K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcPl3+ScSg2:%>инува̄нын K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcPl3+ScSg3:%>инува̄нэ K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcPl3+ScDu1:%>инуванме̄н K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcPl3+ScDu2:%>инуваны̄н K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcPl3+ScDu3:%>инуванэ̄н K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcPl3+ScPl1:%>инуванув K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcPl3+ScPl2:%>инуваны̄н K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcPl3+ScPl3:%>инува̄ныл K ;

+V+Cond+Prs+ScSg1:%>янӯвум K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+ScSg2:%>янӯвын K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+ScSg3:%>янув K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+ScDu1:%>януваме̄н K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+ScDu2:%>янувы̄н K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+ScDu3:%>янувы̄г K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+ScPl1:%>янувӯв K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+ScPl2:%>янувы̄н K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+ScPl3:%>янӯвыт K ;

+V+Cond+Prs+OcSg3+ScSg1:%>янӯвлум K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcSg3+ScSg2:%>янӯвлын K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcSg3+ScSg3:%>янӯвтэ K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcSg3+ScDu1:%>янувламе̄н K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcSg3+ScDu2:%>янувлы̄н K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcSg3+ScDu3:%>янувтэ̄н K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcSg3+ScPl1:%>янувлув K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcSg3+ScPl2:%>янувлын K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcSg3+ScPl3:%>янува̄ныл K ;

+V+Cond+Prs+OcDu3+ScSg1:%>янува̄гум K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcDu3+ScSg2:%>янува̄гын K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcDu3+ScSg3:%>янува̄ге K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcDu3+ScDu1:%>янувагме̄н K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcDu3+ScDu2:%>янувагы̄н K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcDu3+ScDu3:%>януваге̄н K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcDu3+ScPl1:%>янувагув K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcDu3+ScPl2:%>янувагы̄н K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcDu3+ScPl3:%>янувага̄ныл K ;

+V+Cond+Prs+OcPl3+ScSg1:%>янува̄нум K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcPl3+ScSg2:%>янува̄нын K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcPl3+ScSg3:%>янува̄нэ K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcPl3+ScDu1:%>януванме̄н K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcPl3+ScDu2:%>януваны̄н K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcPl3+ScDu3:%>януванэ̄н K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcPl3+ScPl1:%>януванув K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcPl3+ScPl2:%>януваны̄н K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcPl3+ScPl3:%>янува̄ныл K ;

+V+Imp+ScSg2:%>ен K ;
+V+Imp+ScDu2:%>е̄н K ;
+V+Imp+ScPl2:%>е̄н K ;
