src/morphology/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON Verbs
ёл-ханувъяӈкве:ёл-ханувъ V22_even "пристать /прилипнуть/" ;
матувъяӈкве:матувъ V22_even "постареть" ;
нёлувъяӈкве:нёлувъ V22_even "лизнуть" ;
то̄сувъяӈкве:то̄сувъ V22_even "завянуть" ;
тув-ханувъяӈкве:тув-ханувъ V22_even "прилипнуть" ;
тыстувъяӈкве:тыстувъ V22_even "вздохнуть " ;
хо̄лувъяӈкве:хо̄лувъ V22_even "завянуть" ;
хот-толувъяӈкве:хот-толувъ V22_even "оттаять" ;
хот-хо̄лувъяӈкве:хот-хо̄лувъ V22_even "вянуть//увядать" ;
